Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB195.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 141 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Eligible costs" means any down payment or closing cost associated with
the purchase of a qualified principal residence and does not include any
costs incurred prior to the establishment of an eligible savings account;
(b) "Eligible savings account" means an account established and designated by
a financial institution as having the sole purpose of saving for eligible costs
associated with the purchase of a qualified principal residence by a first-
time home buyer;
(c) "Financial institution" means a financial institution as defined in KRS
286.11-003 that has a physical location in this state;
(d) "First-time home buyer" means an individual who purchases or has the
intent to purchase a qualified principal residence in this state and has not
had an ownership interest in a principal residence for a minimum of ten
(10) years prior to the date in which tax incentives are utilized under this
section; and
(e) "Qualified principal residence" means a single-family residence within this
state and that meets the qualifications for a principal residence for purposes
of Section 121 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, but before
January 1, 2036, a first-time home buyer shall be allowed a deduction in
each taxable year for contributions made into an eligible savings account
and may exclude any interest earned therefrom.
(b) Deductions and exclusions under paragraph (a) of this subsection in any
Page 1 of 13
XXXX 1/9/2025 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1196
taxable year shall be limited to:
1. Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for single individuals or taxpayers
filing a separate return; or
2. Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for married individuals filing
separately on a combined form or a joint tax return.
(3) The total of tax incentives claimed under this section for taxable years beginning
on or after January 1, 2026, but before January 1, 2036, shall not exceed:
(a) Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for single account holders filing a
single return or separate returns; or
(b) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for joint account holders filing separately
on a combined form or a joint tax return.
(4) (a) The department may request bank statements or other necessary forms of
verification to confirm:
1. The annual contribution made to an eligible savings account;
2. The total interest income earned from an eligible savings account; or
3. That funds were withdrawn from an eligible savings account for
eligible costs by a first-time home buyer.
(b) If a first-time home buyer withdraws and uses funds from an eligible
savings account for something other than eligible costs, recapture of the
deduction or exclusion shall be claimed as an addition to income on the
return for the taxable year in which the funds were withdrawn.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, funds may be withdrawn
from an eligible savings account for circumstances that involve the:
1. Death or disability of an account holder;
2. Exhaustion of an account holder's unemployment compensation as a
result of a job loss;
3. Disbursement of account assets under a bankruptcy proceeding in
Page 2 of 13
XXXX 1/9/2025 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1196
accordance with the United States Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. secs.
101 to 110; or
4. Transfer or deposit of funds into another eligible savings account
within sixty (60) days of the withdrawal.
(5) (a) In order for the General Assembly to evaluate the effectiveness of this
section, the department shall submit the following information to the
Legislative Research Commission and the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue on or before November 1, 2027, and on or
before each November 1 thereafter as long as the eligible savings account
tax deduction and the exclusion may be claimed on a return:
1. The location of the taxpayer, by county, as reflected on the return filed
for the taxable year;
2. The amount of eligible savings account contribution deductions
claimed by the taxpayer for the taxable year;
3. The amount of the eligible savings account income exclusions claimed
by the taxpayer for the taxable year;
4. The total cumulative amount of all eligible savings account
contribution deductions claimed for the taxable year;
5. The total cumulative amount of all eligible savings account income
exclusions claimed for the taxable; and
6. Based on ranges of adjusted gross income of no larger than five
thousand dollars ($5,000) for the taxable year, the total amount of tax
deductions claimed and the total number of returns claiming a tax
deduction for each adjusted gross income range; and
7. Based on ranges of adjusted gross income of no larger than five
thousand dollars ($5,000) for the taxable year, the total amount of
exclusions claimed and the total number of returns claiming an
Page 3 of 13
XXXX 1/9/2025 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1196
exclusion of interest for each adjusted gross income range.
(b) The information required to be reported under this section shall not be
considered confidential taxpayer information and shall not be subject to
KRS Chapter 131 or any other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes
prohibiting disclosure or reporting of information.
Section 2. KRS 141.019 is amended to read as follows:
In the case of taxpayers other than corporations:
(1) Adjusted gross income shall be calculated by subtracting from the gross income of
those taxpayers the deductions allowed individuals by Section 62 of the Internal
Revenue Code and adjusting as follows:
(a) Exclude income that is exempt from state taxation by the Kentucky
Constitution and the Constitution and statutory laws of the United States;
(b) Exclude income from supplemental annuities provided by the Railroad
Retirement Act of 1937 as amended and which are subject to federal income
tax by Pub. L. No. 89-699;
(c) Include interest income derived from obligations of sister states and political
subdivisions thereof;
(d) Exclude employee pension contributions picked up as provided for in KRS
6.505, 16.545, 21.360, 61.523, 61.560, 65.155, 67A.320, 67A.510, 78.610,
and 161.540 upon a ruling by the Internal Revenue Service or the federal
courts that these contributions shall not be included as gross income until such
time as the contributions are distributed or made available to the employee;
(e) Exclude Social Security and railroad retirement benefits subject to federal
income tax;
(f) Exclude any money received because of a settlement or judgment in a lawsuit
brought against a manufacturer or distributor of "Agent Orange" for damages
resulting from exposure to Agent Orange by a member or veteran of the
Page 4 of 13
XXXX 1/9/2025 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1196
Armed Forces of the United States or any dependent of such person who
served in Vietnam;
(g) 1. a. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2005, but before
January 1, 2018, exclude up to forty-one thousand one hundred ten
dollars ($41,110) of total distributions from pension plans, annuity
contracts, profit-sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee
savings plans; and
b. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, exclude
up to thirty-one thousand one hundred ten dollars ($31,110) of
total distributions from pension plans, annuity contracts, profit-
sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee savings plans.
2. As used in this paragraph:
a. "Annuity contract" has the same meaning as set forth in Section
1035 of the Internal Revenue Code;
b. "Distributions" includes but is not limited to any lump-sum
distribution from pension or profit-sharing plans qualifying for the
income tax averaging provisions of Section 402 of the Internal
Revenue Code; any distribution from an individual retirement
account as defined in Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code;
and any disability pension distribution; and
c. "Pension plans, profit-sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee
savings plans" means any trust or other entity created or organized
under a written retirement plan and forming part of a stock bonus,
pension, or profit-sharing plan of a public or private employer for
the exclusive benefit of employees or their beneficiaries and
includes plans qualified or unqualified under Section 401 of the
Internal Revenue Code and individual retirement accounts as
Page 5 of 13
XXXX 1/9/2025 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1196
defined in Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(h) 1. a. Exclude the portion of the distributive share of a shareholder's net
income from an S corporation subject to the franchise tax imposed
under KRS 136.505 or the capital stock tax imposed under KRS
136.300; and
b. Exclude the portion of the distributive share of a shareholder's net
income from an S corporation related to a qualified subchapter S
subsidiary subject to the franchise tax imposed under KRS
136.505 or the capital stock tax imposed under KRS 136.300.
2. The shareholder's basis of stock held in an S corporation where the S
corporation or its qualified subchapter S subsidiary is subject to the
franchise tax imposed under KRS 136.505 or the capital stock tax
imposed under KRS 136.300 shall be the same as the basis for federal
income tax purposes;
(i) Exclude income received for services performed as a precinct worker for
election training or for working at election booths in state, county, and local
primaries or regular or special elections;
(j) Exclude any capital gains income attributable to property taken by eminent
domain;
(k) 1. Exclude all income from all sources for members of the Armed Forces
who are on active duty and who are killed in the line of duty, for the
year during which the death occurred and the year prior to the year
during which the death occurred.
2. For the purposes of this paragraph, "all income from all sources" shall
include all federal and state death benefits payable to the estate or any
beneficiaries;
(l) Exclude all military pay received by members of the Armed Forces while on
Page 6 of 13
XXXX 1/9/2025 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1196
active duty;
(m) 1. Include the amount deducted for depreciation under 26 U.S.C. sec. 167
or 168; and
2. Exclude the amounts allowed by KRS 141.0101 for depreciation;
(n) Include the amount deducted under 26 U.S.C. sec. 199A;
(o) Ignore any change in the cost basis of the surviving spouse's share of property
owned by a Kentucky community property trust occurring for federal income
tax purposes as a result of the death of the predeceasing spouse;
(p) Allow the same treatment allowed under Pub. L. No. 116-260, secs. 276 and
278, related to the tax treatment of forgiven covered loans, deductions
attributable to those loans, and tax attributes associated with those loans for
taxable years ending on or after March 27, 2020, but before January 1, 2022;[
and]
(q) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, but before March 11,
2023, allow the same treatment of restaurant revitalization grants in
accordance with Pub. L. No. 117-2, sec. 9673 and 15 U.S.C. sec. 9009c,
related to the tax treatment of the grants, deductions attributable to those
grants, and tax attributes associated with those grants;[ and]
(r) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, but before
January 1, 2036, exclude amounts contributed to an eligible savings
account for use by a first-time home buyer in accordance with Section 1 of
this Act; and
(s) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, but before
January 1, 2036, exclude interest income received from an eligible savings
account for use by a first-time home buyer in accordance with Section 1 of
this Act; and
(2) Net income shall be calculated by subtracting from adjusted gross income all the
Page 7 of 13
XXXX 1/9/2025 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1196
deductions allowed individuals by Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code, as
modified by KRS 141.0101, except:
(a) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 164 for taxes;
(b) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 165 for losses, except wagering
losses allowed under Section 165(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(c) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 213 for medical care expenses;
(d) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 217 for moving expenses;
(e) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 67 for any other miscellaneous
deduction;
(f) Any deduction allowed by the Internal Revenue Code for amounts allowable
under KRS 140.090(1)(h) in calculating the value of the distributive shares of
the estate of a decedent, unless there is filed with the income return a
statement that the deduction has not been claimed under KRS 140.090(1)(h);
(g) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 151 for personal exemptions and
any other deductions in lieu thereof;
(h) Any deduction allowed for amounts paid to any club, organization, or
establishment which has been determined by the courts or an agency
established by the General Assembly and charged with enforcing the civil
rights laws of the Commonwealth, not to afford full and equal membership
and full and equal enjoyment of its goods, services, facilities, privileges,
advantages, or accommodations to any person because of race, color, religion,
national origin, or sex, except nothing shall be construed to deny a deduction
for amounts paid to any religious or denominational club, group, or
establishment or any organization operated solely for charitable or educational
purposes which restricts membership to persons of the same religion or
denomination in order to promote the religious principles for which it is
established and maintained; and
Page 8 of 13
XXXX 1/9/2025 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1196
(i) A taxpayer may elect to claim the standard deduction allowed by KRS
141.081 instead of itemized deductions allowed pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 63
and as modified by this section.
Section 3. KRS 131.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No present or former commissioner or employee of the department, present or
former member of a county board of assessment appeals, present or former property
valuation administrator or employee, present or former secretary or employee of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet, former secretary or employee of the Revenue
Cabinet, or any other person, shall intentionally and without authorization inspect
or divulge any information acquired by him or her of the affairs of any person, or
information regarding the tax schedules, returns, or reports required to be filed with
the department or other proper officer, or any information produced by a hearing or
investigation, insofar as the information may have to do with the affairs of the
person's business.
(2) The prohibition established by subsection (1) of this section shall not extend to:
(a) Information required in prosecutions for making false reports or returns of
property for taxation, or any other infraction of the tax laws;
(b) Any matter properly entered upon any assessment record, or in any way made
a matter of public record;
(c) Furnishing any taxpayer or his or her properly authorized agent with
information respecting his or her own return;
(d) Testimony provided by the commissioner or any employee of the department
in any court, or the introduction as evidence of returns or reports filed with the
department, in an action for violation of state or federal tax laws or in any
action challenging state or federal tax laws;
(e) Providing an owner of unmined coal, oil or gas reserves, and other mineral or
energy resources assessed under KRS 132.820, or owners of surface land
Page 9 of 13
XXXX 1/9/2025 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1196
under which the unmined minerals lie, factual information about the owner's
property derived from third-party returns filed for that owner's property, under
the provisions of KRS 132.820, that is used to determine the owner's
assessment. This information shall be provided to the owner on a confidential
basis, and the owner shall be subject to the penalties provided in KRS
131.990(2). The third-party filer shall be given prior notice of any disclosure
of information to the owner that was provided by the third-party filer;
(f) Providing to a third-party purchaser pursuant to an order entered in a
foreclosure action filed in a court of competent jurisdiction, factual
information related to the owner or lessee of coal, oil, gas reserves, or any
other mineral resources assessed under KRS 132.820. The department may
promulgate an administrative regulation establishing a fee schedule for the
provision of the information described in this paragraph. Any fee imposed
shall not exceed the greater of the actual cost of providing the information or
ten dollars ($10);
(g) Providing information to a licensing agency, the Transportation Cabinet, or
the Kentucky Supreme Court under KRS 131.1817;
(h) Statistics of gasoline and special fuels gallonage reported to the department
under KRS 138.210 to 138.448;
(i) Providing any utility gross receipts license tax return information that is
necessary to administer the provisions of KRS 160.613 to 160.617 to
applicable school districts on a confidential basis;
(j) Providing documents, data, or other information to a third party pursuant to an
order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(k) Publishing administrative writings on its official website in accordance with
KRS 131.020(1)(b); or
(l) Providing information to the Legislative Research Commission under:
Page 10 of 13
XXXX 1/9/2025 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1196
1. KRS 139.519 for purposes of the sales and use tax refund on building
materials used for disaster recovery;
2. KRS 141.436 for purposes of the energy efficiency products credits;
3. KRS 141.437 for purposes of the ENERGY STAR home and the
ENERGY STAR manufactured home credits;
4. KRS 141.383 for purposes of the film industry incentives;
5. KRS 154.26-095 for purposes of the Kentucky industrial revitalization
credit[tax credits] and the job assessment fees;
6. KRS 141.068 for purposes of the Kentucky investment fund;
7. KRS 141.396 for purposes of the angel investor [tax ]credit;
8. KRS 141.389 for purposes of the distilled spirits credit;
9. KRS 141.408 for purposes of the inventory credit;
10. KRS 141.390 for purposes of the recycling and composting
credits[credit];
11. KRS 141.3841 for purposes of the selling farmer [tax ]credit;
12. KRS 141.4231 for purposes of the renewable chemical production [tax
]credit;
13. KRS 141.524 for purposes of the Education Opportunity Account
Program [tax ]credit;
14. KRS 141.398 for purposes of the development area [tax ]credit;
15. KRS 139.516 for [the ]purposes of the sales and use tax exemptions
for[exemption on] the commercial mining of cryptocurrency;
16. KRS 141.419 for purposes of the decontamination [tax ]credit;
17. KRS 141.391 for purposes of the qualified broadband investment [tax
]credit;[ and]
18. KRS 139.499 for purposes of the sales and use tax
exemptions[exemption] for a qualified data center project; and
Page 11 of 13
XXXX 1/9/2025 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1196
19. Section 1 of this Act for purposes of the deduction for contributions
made to an eligible savings account and the exclusion of interest
earned therefrom.
(3) The commissioner shall make available any information for official use only and on
a confidential basis to the proper officer, agency, board or commission of this state,
any Kentucky county, any Kentucky city, any other state, or the federal
government, under reciprocal agreements whereby the department shall receive
similar or useful information in return.
(4) Access to and inspection of information received from the Internal Revenue Service
is for department use only, and is restricted to tax administration purposes.
Information received from the Internal Revenue Service shall not be made available
to any other agency of state government, or any county, city, or other state, and
shall not be inspected intentionally and without authorization by any present
secretary or employee of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, commissioner or
employee of the department, or any other person.
(5) Statistics of crude oil as reported to the department under the crude oil excise tax
requirements of KRS Chapter 137 and statistics of natural gas production as
reported to the department under the natural resources severance tax requirements
of KRS Chapter 143A may be made public by the department by release to the
Energy and Environment Cabinet, Department for Natural Resources.
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning with mine-map
submissions for the 1989 tax year, the department may make public or divulge only
those portions of mine maps submitted by taxpayers to the department pursuant to
KRS Chapter 132 for ad valorem tax purposes that depict the boundaries of mined-
out parcel areas. These electronic maps shall not be relied upon to determine actual
boundaries of mined-out parcel areas. Property boundaries contained in mine maps
required under KRS Chapters 350 and 352 shall not be construed to constitute land
Page 12 of 13
XXXX 1/9/2025 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1196
surveying or boundary surveys as defined by KRS 322.010 and any administrative
regulations promulgated thereto.
Page 13 of 13
XXXX 1/9/2025 4:50 PM Jacketed